Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202379-3604
Behavioral Training Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Behavioral Training Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the State Department of Education, shall consist of money transferred pursuant to section 79-3501 and any money transferred by the Legislature, and shall be used for the purposes of coordinating training and administering the teacher support system in compliance with the Behavioral Intervention Training and Teacher Support Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 5.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.